apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 38890
	Sdefs: 27
	Paradigms: 1355
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix /tmp/nounred.dix /tmp/fixed.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>hHiIoOdDrRcCsSaAíÍéÉfFeEnNlLbBmMtTyYxXáÁuUgGóÓpPwWkKúÚqQvVzZjJ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="com" /> 
    <sdef n="emph" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="weak" /> 
    <sdef n="voc" /> 
    <sdef n="strong" /> 
    <sdef n="subst" /> 
    <sdef n="dat" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="pastind" /> 
    <sdef n="presind" /> 
    <sdef n="neg" /> 
    <sdef n="cop" /> 
    <sdef n="pres" /> 
    <sdef n="pers" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="art" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="part" /> 
    <sdef n="comp" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" />
    <sdef n="obj" />
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="2-hiodrocsaídéfheinil__n">
  <e><p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>e-s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ese</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>se</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Aaron__np">
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Aba__np">
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Abarta/ch__np">
  <e><p><l>í</l>         <r>ch<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Abbie__np">
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Abcáis__np">
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Abá/n__np">
  <e><p><l>in</l>        <r>n<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Acae/ch__n">
  <e><p><l>ch-s</l>      <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ch-s</l>      <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ch</l>        <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ch</l>        <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>cha-s</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>cha</l>       <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>chasa</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>chse</l>      <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>chse</l>      <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ich-s</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ich-s</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ich</l>       <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ich</l>       <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ichse</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ichse</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Ada/m__np">
  <e><p><l>im</l>        <r>m<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>m</l>         <r>m<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Aegé/ach__n">
  <e><p><l>ach-s</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ach-s</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ach</l>       <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ach</l>       <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>acha-s</l>    <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>acha</l>      <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>achasa</l>    <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>achsa</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>achsa</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ich-s</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ich-s</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ich</l>       <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ich</l>       <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ichse</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ichse</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Aetópa/ch__n">
  <e><p><l>ch-s</l>      <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ch-s</l>      <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ch</l>        <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ch</l>        <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>cha-s</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>cha</l>       <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>chasa</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>chsa</l>      <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>chsa</l>      <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>igh-s</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>igh-s</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>igh</l>       <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>igh</l>       <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ighse</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ighse</l>     <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Afghanista/n__np">
  <e><p><l>ine</l>       <r>n<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Agaistín__np">
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Agata__np">
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Aibhistín__np">
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Abartach"><i>Abarta</i><par n="Abarta/ch__np"/></e>
<e lm="Acaech"><i>Acae</i><par n="Acae/ch__n"/></e>
<e lm="Adam"><i>Ada</i><par n="Ada/m__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aegéach"><i>Aegé</i><par n="Aegé/ach__n"/></e>
<e lm="Aimhréidh"><i>Aimhréidh</i><par n="Aba__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amazon"><i>Amazo</i><par n="Afghanista/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amhalaí"><i>Amhalaí</i><par n="Aba__np"/></e>
<e lm="Barbadós"><i>Barbadós</i><par n="Agaistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Barra"><i>Barra</i><par n="Aibhistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Basútlainn"><i>Basútlainn</i><par n="Abcáis__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beatrice"><i>Beatrice</i><par n="Abbie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bostún"><i>Bostú</i><par n="Abá/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Béatraís"><i>Béatraís</i><par n="Agata__np"/></e>
<e lm="Calcúta"><i>Calcúta</i><par n="Agaistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cambóid"><i>Cambóid</i><par n="Abcáis__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ciarán"><i>Ciará</i><par n="Abá/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Clucas"><i>Clucas</i><par n="Aaron__np"/></e>
<e lm="Conaire"><i>Conaire</i><par n="Aibhistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Criméach"><i>Crimé</i><par n="Aegé/ach__n"/></e>
<e lm="Cóiréach"><i>Cóiré</i><par n="Aegé/ach__n"/></e>
<e lm="Donnagán"><i>Donnagá</i><par n="Abá/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eabró"><i>Eabró</i><par n="Agata__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eachmhíle"><i>Eachmhíle</i><par n="Aba__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eastóin"><i>Eastóin</i><par n="Abcáis__np"/></e>
<e lm="Egnew"><i>Egnew</i><par n="Aaron__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eileen"><i>Eileen</i><par n="Abbie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eiméid"><i>Eiméid</i><par n="Aibhistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eoghan"><i>Eogha</i><par n="Abá/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gaibriél"><i>Gaibriél</i><par n="Agaistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gearóid"><i>Gearóid</i><par n="Aibhistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gurl"><i>Gurl</i><par n="Aaron__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hilary"><i>Hilary</i><par n="Abbie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Iasachta"><i>Iasachta</i><par n="Aba__np"/></e>
<e lm="Iodáil"><i>Iodáil</i><par n="Abcáis__np"/></e>
<e lm="Iodúimé"><i>Iodúimé</i><par n="Agata__np"/></e>
<e lm="Japan"><i>Japa</i><par n="Afghanista/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kealan"><i>Kealan</i><par n="Abbie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kiroy"><i>Kiroy</i><par n="Aaron__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lebanon"><i>Lebano</i><par n="Afghanista/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Leon"><i>Leo</i><par n="Abá/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lisbon"><i>Lisbo</i><par n="Afghanista/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Malaech"><i>Malae</i><par n="Acae/ch__n"/></e>
<e lm="Manannach"><i>Mananna</i><par n="Aetópa/ch__n"/></e>
<e lm="Manchain"><i>Manchain</i><par n="Agata__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maureen"><i>Maureen</i><par n="Abbie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mungey"><i>Mungey</i><par n="Aaron__np"/></e>
<e lm="Máirtín"><i>Máirtín</i><par n="Aibhistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Naoise"><i>Naoise</i><par n="Agaistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Niallán"><i>Niallá</i><par n="Abá/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nile"><i>Nile</i><par n="Abcáis__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ornat"><i>Ornat</i><par n="Abbie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sicil"><i>Sicil</i><par n="Abcáis__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sorley"><i>Sorley</i><par n="Aaron__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sudan"><i>Suda</i><par n="Afghanista/n__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sílbhe"><i>Sílbhe</i><par n="Agata__np"/></e>
<e lm="Uid"><i>Uid</i><par n="Aba__np"/></e>
<e lm="Uragua"><i>Uragua</i><par n="Agaistín__np"/></e>
<e lm="Veindéach"><i>Veindé</i><par n="Aegé/ach__n"/></e>
<e lm="banóstach"><i>banósta</i><par n="Aetópa/ch__n"/></e>
<e lm="cailm"><i>cailm</i><par n="2-hiodrocsaídéfheinil__n"/></e>
<e lm="cuthach"><i>cutha</i><par n="Aetópa/ch__n"/></e>
<e lm="diomailt"><i>diomailt</i><par n="2-hiodrocsaídéfheinil__n"/></e>
<e lm="déach"><i>dé</i><par n="Aegé/ach__n"/></e>
<e lm="féaránach"><i>féarána</i><par n="Aetópa/ch__n"/></e>
<e lm="gaing"><i>gaing</i><par n="2-hiodrocsaídéfheinil__n"/></e>
<e lm="léic"><i>léic</i><par n="2-hiodrocsaídéfheinil__n"/></e>
<e lm="peannaid"><i>peannaid</i><par n="2-hiodrocsaídéfheinil__n"/></e>
<e lm="searrach"><i>searra</i><par n="Aetópa/ch__n"/></e>
<e lm="steiréiceimic"><i>steiréiceimic</i><par n="2-hiodrocsaídéfheinil__n"/></e>
<e lm="Ábraham"><i>Ábraha</i><par n="Ada/m__np"/></e>
<e lm="Éímhigh"><i>Éímhigh</i><par n="Aba__np"/></e>
